test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kumppi_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kumppi: # ok KUMPPI
    kumppi+N+Sg+Nom:   kumppi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Gen:   kuumpi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Acc:   kuumpi
    kumppi+N+Sg+Ill:   kuumpin
    kumppi+N+Sg+Loc:   kuumpist
    kumppi+N+Sg+Com:   kumppijn
    kumppi+N+Sg+Abe:   kumpittáá
    kumppi+N+Ess:      kumppin
    kumppi+N+Par:      kumppid
    kumppi+N+Pl+Nom:   kuumpih
    kumppi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuumpij, kumpij]
    kumppi+N+Pl+Acc:   kuumpijd
    kumppi+N+Pl+Ill:   kumppijd
    kumppi+N+Pl+Loc:   kuumpijn
    kumppi+N+Pl+Com:   [kumpijguin, kumpijgijn]
    kumppi+N+Pl+Abe:   kumpijttáá


  Noun - peldi: # ok KUMPPI
    peldi+N+Sg+Nom:   peldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Gen:   peeldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Acc:   peeldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Ill:   peeldin
    peldi+N+Sg+Loc:   peeldist
    peldi+N+Sg+Com:   peldijn
    peldi+N+Sg+Abe:   peldittáá
    peldi+N+Ess:      peldin
    peldi+N+Par:      peldid
    peldi+N+Pl+Nom:   peeldih
    peldi+N+Pl+Gen:  [peeldij, peldij]
    peldi+N+Pl+Acc:   peeldijd
    peldi+N+Pl+Ill:   peldijd
    peldi+N+Pl+Loc:   peeldijn
    peldi+N+Pl+Com:   [peldijguin, peldijgijn]
    peldi+N+Pl+Abe:   peldijttáá

  Noun - stovli: # ok KUMPPI
    stovli+N+Sg+Nom:   stovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Gen:   stoovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Acc:   stoovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Ill:   stoovlin
    stovli+N+Sg+Loc:   stoovlist
    stovli+N+Sg+Com:   stovlijn
    stovli+N+Sg+Abe:   stovlittáá
    stovli+N+Ess:      stovlin
    stovli+N+Par:      stovlid
    stovli+N+Pl+Nom:   stoovlih
    stovli+N+Pl+Gen:  [stoovlij, stovlij]
    stovli+N+Pl+Acc:   stoovlijd
    stovli+N+Pl+Ill:   stovlijd
    stovli+N+Pl+Loc:   stoovlijn
    stovli+N+Pl+Com:   [stovlijguin, stovlijgijn]
    stovli+N+Pl+Abe:   stovlijttáá

  Noun - rahti: # ok KUMPPI
    rahti+N+Sg+Nom:   rahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Gen:   raahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Acc:   raahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Ill:   raahtin
    rahti+N+Sg+Loc:   raahtist
    rahti+N+Sg+Com:   rahtijn
    rahti+N+Sg+Abe:   rahtittáá
    rahti+N+Ess:      rahtin
    rahti+N+Par:      rahtid
    rahti+N+Pl+Nom:   raahtih
    rahti+N+Pl+Gen:  [raahtij, rahtij]
    rahti+N+Pl+Acc:   raahtijd
    rahti+N+Pl+Ill:   rahtijd
    rahti+N+Pl+Loc:   raahtijn
    rahti+N+Pl+Com:   [rahtijguin, rahtijgijn]
    rahti+N+Pl+Abe:   rahtijttáá

  Noun - tatti: # ok KUMPPI
    tatti+N+Sg+Nom:   tatti
    tatti+N+Sg+Gen:   taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Acc:   taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Ill:   taatin
    tatti+N+Sg+Loc:   taatist
    tatti+N+Sg+Com:   tattijn
    tatti+N+Sg+Abe:   tatittáá
    tatti+N+Ess:      tattin
    tatti+N+Par:      tattid
    tatti+N+Pl+Nom:   taatih
    tatti+N+Pl+Gen:  [taatij, tatij]
    tatti+N+Pl+Acc:   taatijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Ill:   tattijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Loc:   taatijn
    tatti+N+Pl+Com:   [tatijguin, tatijgijn]
    tatti+N+Pl+Abe:   tatijttáá
    
  Noun - printti: # ok KUMPPI
    printti+N+Sg+Nom:   printti
    printti+N+Sg+Gen:   priinti
    printti+N+Sg+Acc:   priinti
    printti+N+Sg+Ill:   priintin
    printti+N+Sg+Loc:   priintist
    printti+N+Sg+Com:   printtijn
    printti+N+Sg+Abe:   printittáá
    printti+N+Ess:      printtin
    printti+N+Par:      printtid
    printti+N+Pl+Nom:   priintih
    printti+N+Pl+Gen:  [priintij, printij]
    printti+N+Pl+Acc:   priintijd
    printti+N+Pl+Ill:   printtijd
    printti+N+Pl+Loc:   priintijn
    printti+N+Pl+Com:   [printijguin, printijgijn]
    printti+N+Pl+Abe:   printijttáá

  Noun - torvi: # ok KUMPPI
    torvi+N+Sg+Nom:   torvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Gen:   toorvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Acc:   toorvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Ill:   toorvin
    torvi+N+Sg+Loc:   toorvist
    torvi+N+Sg+Com:   torvijn
    torvi+N+Sg+Abe:   torvittáá
    torvi+N+Ess:      torvin
    torvi+N+Par:      torvid
    torvi+N+Pl+Nom:   toorvih
    torvi+N+Pl+Gen:  [toorvij, torvij]
    torvi+N+Pl+Acc:   toorvijd
    torvi+N+Pl+Ill:   torvijd
    torvi+N+Pl+Loc:   toorvijn
    torvi+N+Pl+Com:   [torvijguin, torvijgijn]
    torvi+N+Pl+Abe:   torvijttáá

  Noun - purkki: # ok KUMPPI
    purkki+N+Sg+Nom:   purkki
    purkki+N+Sg+Gen:   puurki
    purkki+N+Sg+Acc:   puurki
    purkki+N+Sg+Ill:   puurkin
    purkki+N+Sg+Loc:   puurkist
    purkki+N+Sg+Com:   purkkijn
    purkki+N+Sg+Abe:   purkittáá
    purkki+N+Ess:      purkkin
    purkki+N+Par:      purkkid
    purkki+N+Pl+Nom:   puurkih
    purkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [puurkij, purkij]
    purkki+N+Pl+Acc:   puurkijd
    purkki+N+Pl+Ill:   purkkijd
    purkki+N+Pl+Loc:   puurkijn
    purkki+N+Pl+Com:   [purkijguin, purkijgijn]
    purkki+N+Pl+Abe:   purkijttáá

  Noun - muŋkki: # ok KUMPPI
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Nom:   muŋkki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Gen:   muuŋki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Acc:   muuŋki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Ill:   muuŋkin
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Loc:   muuŋkist
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Com:   muŋkkijn
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Abe:   muŋkittáá
    muŋkki+N+Ess:      muŋkkin
    muŋkki+N+Par:      muŋkkid
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Nom:   muuŋkih
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [muuŋkij, muŋkij]
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Acc:   muuŋkijd
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Ill:   muŋkkijd
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Loc:   muuŋkijn
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Com:   [muŋkijguin, muŋkijgijn]
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Abe:   muŋkijttáá

  Noun - hissi: # ok KUMPPI
    hissi+N+Sg+Nom:   hissi
    hissi+N+Sg+Gen:   hiisi
    hissi+N+Sg+Acc:   hiisi
    hissi+N+Sg+Ill:   hiisin
    hissi+N+Sg+Loc:   hiisist
    hissi+N+Sg+Com:   hissijn
    hissi+N+Sg+Abe:   hisittáá
    hissi+N+Ess:      hissin
    hissi+N+Par:      hissid
    hissi+N+Pl+Nom:   hiisih
    hissi+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiisij, hisij]
    hissi+N+Pl+Acc:   hiisijd
    hissi+N+Pl+Ill:   hissijd
    hissi+N+Pl+Loc:   hiisijn
    hissi+N+Pl+Com:   [hisijguin, hisijgijn]
    hissi+N+Pl+Abe:   hisijttáá
